Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.090

Amendments to articles.

The articles of incorporation may be amended by a majority vote of the members voting thereon, at any regular meeting or at any special meeting called for that purpose, after notice of the proposed amendment has been given to all members entitled to vote thereon, in the manner provided by the bylaws: PROVIDED, That if the total vote upon the proposed amendment shall be less than twenty-five percent of the total membership of the association, the amendment shall not be approved. At the meeting, members may vote upon the proposed amendment in person, or by written proxy, or by mailed ballot. The power to amend shall include the power to extend the period of its duration for a further definite time or perpetually, and also include the power to increase or diminish the amount of capital stock and the number of shares: PROVIDED, The amount of the capital stock shall not be diminished below the amount of the paid-up capital stock at the time such amendment is adopted. After the adoption of an amendment to its articles of incorporation, the association shall cause a copy of such amendment adopted to be recorded in the office of the secretary of state as provided in RCW 24.06.195.

[ 1989 c 307 s 23; 1982 c 35 s 174; 1981 c 297 s 32; 1961 c 34 s 2; 1913 c 19 s 6; RRS s 3909. Formerly RCW 23.56.090.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.